Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Chapter 11

Juvenile Offender Surcharges

37-11-101. Legislative findings and intent.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the commission of violent crimes by juveniles exacts an unacceptable toll on the fiscal resources of both state and local governments and thereby increases the financial burden upon the taxpayers of this state. It is the intent of the general assembly in enacting this chapter to require, as much as possible, that juveniles convicted as adults of violent crimes pay for the cost of the rehabilitation, education, and treatment of juveniles sentenced to the youthful offender system or committed to the department of correction.

Acts 1994, ch. 984, § 1.

37-11-102. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Convicted” and “conviction” means a plea of guilty or a verdict of guilty by a judge or jury, and includes a plea of no contest accepted by the court;

“Juvenile” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age; and

“Violent crime” means a felony enumerated as a violent crime under § 40-35-118 or a felony involving a weapon or firearm.

Acts 1994, ch. 984, § 1.

37-11-103. Disposition of juvenile fines — Youthful offender system fund.

Each juvenile who is convicted as an adult of a violent crime shall be required to pay any fine imposed by the court to the clerk of such court, who shall allocate the fine as follows:

Five percent (5%) shall be retained by the clerk for administrative costs incurred pursuant to this section. Such amount retained shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund, and such amount shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the costs of such administration;

Ninety-five percent (95%) shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the youthful offender system fund created pursuant to subsection (b).

There is hereby created in the state treasury a youthful offender system fund, which shall consist of moneys received by the state treasurer pursuant to subdivision (a)(2). In accordance with § 8-22-118, all interest derived from the deposit and investment of this fund shall be credited to the general fund. Any moneys not appropriated by the general assembly shall remain in the youthful offender system fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year. All moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the division of youth services in the department of correction to cover the direct and indirect costs associated with the rehabilitation, education, and treatment of juvenile offenders committed to the department.

Acts 1994, ch. 984, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 984, § 1 potentially authorized the creation of a youthful offender system; however, such system, was not approved by the Ninety-Eighth General Assembly.